West Virginia, session 2025, SB679.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Repeal of article relating to mandatory state inspections of motor vehicles. That §17C-16-1, §17C-16-2, §17C-16-3, §17C-16-4, §17C-16-5, §17C-16-6, §17C-16-7, §17C-16-8, and §17C-16-9 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed.